Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.205.010

"Education center," "basic academic skills," defined—Certification as education center and withdrawal of certification.

(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary:

"Education center" means any private school operated on a profit or nonprofit basis which does the following:

(a) Is devoted to the teaching of basic academic skills, including specific attention to improvement of student motivation for achieving, and employment orientation.

(b) Operates on a clinical, client centered basis. This shall include, but not be limited to, performing diagnosis of individual educational abilities, determination and setting of individual goals, prescribing and providing individual courses of instruction therefor, and evaluation of each individual client's progress in his or her educational program.

(c) Conducts courses of instruction by professionally trained personnel certificated by the Washington professional educator standards board according to rules adopted for the purposes of this chapter and providing, for certification purposes, that a year's teaching experience in an education center shall be deemed equal to a year's teaching experience in a common or private school.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, basic academic skills shall include the study of mathematics, speech, language, reading and composition, science, history, literature and political science or civics; it shall not include courses of a vocational training nature and shall not include courses deemed nonessential to the accrediting or the approval of private schools under RCW 28A.305.130.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall certify an education center only upon application and (a) determination that such school comes within the definition thereof as set forth in subsection (1) of this section and (b) demonstration on the basis of actual educational performance of such applicants' students which shows after consideration of their students' backgrounds, educational gains that are a direct result of the applicants' educational program. Such certification may be withdrawn if the superintendent finds that a center fails to provide adequate instruction in basic academic skills. No education center certified by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section shall be deemed a common school under RCW 28A.150.020 or a private school for the purposes of RCW 28A.195.010 through 28A.195.050.

[ 2006 c 263 s 408; 2005 c 497 s 214; 1999 c 348 s 2; 1993 c 211 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 180; 1983 c 3 s 38; 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.97.010.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Intent—1999 c 348: "During 1997 and 1998, a committee of the state board of education reviewed all board rules and related authorizing statutes. Based on the findings and recommendations resulting from the review, the state board prepared a report to the legislature requesting action be taken. It is the intent of this act to implement recommendations of the state board of education." [ 1999 c 348 s 1.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 341: "If any provision of this 1977 act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 7.]